Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.743

School board members—Eligibility for health benefits.

(1) For purposes of this section, "school board member" means the board of directors of a school district as governed by chapter 28A.343 RCW or the board of directors of an educational service district as governed by chapter 28A.310 RCW.

(2) As of January 1, 2024, a school board member may participate in the benefit plans offered by and subject to the terms and conditions determined by the school employees' benefits board. A school board member may enroll in medical, dental, and vision benefits and shall be responsible for premium rates developed by the authority. A school board member shall be responsible for submitting the full self-pay premium amount for the benefits the member elects to enroll in for each month the member is covered.

(3) A school board member may participate in the school employees' benefits board program for the duration of the member's elected term as a school board member and may renew the member's participation at the start of each subsequent term as a school board member.

(4) If a school board member voluntarily ends the member's enrollment in the school employees' benefits board program prior to the end of their elected term, the member is no longer eligible under this section to participate in the school employees' benefits board program for the remainder of the member's elected term.

(5) This section does not create any eligibility for school board members to participate in retiree benefits provided by the public employees' benefits board program.

[ 2023 c 13 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2023 c 13: See note following RCW 41.05.011.